Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1577.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1492.07, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1492.07. Exemptions; private clubs, religious organizations This article does not apply to: 1. private clubs or establishments exempted from coverage under title II of the civil rights act of 1964 (42 United States Code section 2000(a)(e)) or to religious organizations or entities controlled by religious organizations, including places of worship. 2. Websites. END_STATUTE